North Carolina statutes. Chapter 84. Attorneys-at-Law.
Article 4. North Carolina State Bar.

§ 84-15.
Creation of North Carolina State Bar as an agency of the State.

There is hereby created as an agency of the State of North Carolina, for the purposes and with the powers hereinafter set forth, the North Carolina State Bar.

History.

1933, c. 210, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For review of this section and those immediately following, see 11 N.C.L. Rev. 191 (1933).

For article on “The Organized Bar in North Carolina,” see 30 N.C.L. Rev. 337 (1952).

For article on administrative evidence rules, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 635 (1971).

For survey of 1977 law on professional responsibility and the administration of justice, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 871 (1978).

For article, “Wrongfully Discharged In-House Counsel:
A Proposal to Give the Employer a Veto Over Reinstatement While Giving he Terminated Lawyer Front Pay,” see 52 Wake Forest L. Rev. 649 (2017).

For article, “’They’re Digging in the Wrong Place:’ How Learning Outcomes Can Improve Bar Exams and Ensure Practice Ready Attorneys,” see 10 Elon L. Rev. 239 (2018).

For article, “Lead Us Not into Temptation: Should Attorneys Who Contract to Provide Administrative Adjudication Services Be Insulated from Those Who Compensate Them?,” see 68 Duke L.J. 24 (2019).

§ 84-16.
Membership and privileges.

The membership of the North Carolina State Bar shall consist of two classes, active and inactive.

The active members shall be all persons who have obtained a license or certificate, entitling them to practice law in the State of North Carolina, who have paid the membership dues specified, and who have satisfied all other obligations of membership. No person other than a member of the North Carolina State Bar shall practice in any court of the State except foreign attorneys as provided by
statute and natural persons representing themselves.

Inactive members shall be:

All persons who have obtained a license to practice law in the State but who have been found by the Council to be not engaged in the practice of law and not holding themselves out as practicing attorneys and not occupying any public or private positions in which they may be called upon to give legal advice or counsel or to examine the law or to pass upon, adjudicate, or offer an opinion concerning the legal effect of any act, document, or law.

Persons allowed by the Council solely to represent indigent clients on a pro bono basis under the supervision of an active member employed by a nonprofit corporation qualified to render legal services pursuant to

G.S. 84-5.1

.

All active members shall be required to pay annual membership fees, and shall have the right to vote in elections held by the district bar in the judicial district in which the member resides. If a member desires to vote with the bar of some district in which the member practices, other than that in which the member resides, the member may do so by filing with the Secretary of the North Carolina State Bar a statement in writing that the member desires to vote in the other district; provided, however, that in no case shall the member be entitled to vote in more than one district.

History.

1933, c. 210, s. 2; 1939, c. 21, s. 1; 1941, c. 344, ss. 1, 2, 3; 1969, c. 44, s. 60; c. 1190, s. 52; 1973, c. 1152, s. 1; 1981, c. 788, s. 2; 1983, c. 589, s. 1; 1985, c. 621; 1995, c. 431, s. 8; 2007-200, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-200, s. 1, effective July 8, 2007, in the second paragraph, substituted “have obtained a license or certificate” for “shall have heretofore obtained, or who shall hereafter obtain, a license or certificate, which shall at the time be valid and effectual,” deleted “shall” preceding “have paid,” substituted “specified, and who have satisfied all other obligations of membership” for “hereinafter specified, unless classified as an inactive member by the Council as hereinafter provided,” and added “and natural persons representing themselves” at the end; in the third paragraph, inserted the (1) and (2) designations, inserted “who have obtained a license to practice law in the State but who have been” in subdivision (1) and added subdivision (2); and, in the fourth paragraph, deleted “Provided, that” at the beginning of the second sentence and made minor stylistic changes.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on the 1939 and 1941 amendments, see 17 N.C.L. Rev. 341 (1939), and 19 N.C.L. Rev. 453 (1941).

For article, “Reginald Heber Smith and Justice and the Poor in the 21st Century,” see 40 Campbell L. Rev. 73 (2018).

§ 84-17.
Government.

The government of the North Carolina State Bar is vested in a council of the North Carolina State Bar referred to in this Chapter as the “Council.” The Council shall be composed of a variable number of councilors equal to the number of judicial districts plus 16, the officers of the North Carolina State Bar, who shall be councilors during their respective terms of office, and each retiring president of the North Carolina State Bar who shall be a councilor for one year from the date of expiration of his term as president. Notwithstanding any other provisions of the law, the North Carolina State Bar may borrow money and may acquire, hold, rent, encumber, alienate, lease, and otherwise deal with real or personal property in the same manner as any private person or corporation, subject only to the approval of the Governor and the Council of State as to the borrowing of money and the acquisition, rental, encumbering, leasing and sale of real property. The Council shall be competent to exercise the entire powers of the North Carolina State Bar in respect of the interpretation and administration of this Article, the borrowing of money, the acquisition, lease, sale, or mortgage of property, real or personal, the seeking of amendments to this Chapter, and all other matters. There shall be one councilor from each judicial district and 16 additional councilors. The additional councilors shall be allocated and reallocated by the North Carolina State Bar every six years based on the number of active members of each judicial district bar according to the records of the North Carolina State Bar and in accordance with a formula to be adopted by the North Carolina State Bar, to insure an allocation based on lawyer population of each judicial district bar as it relates to the total number of active members of the State Bar.

A councilor whose seat has been eliminated due to a reallocation shall continue to serve on the Council until expiration of the remainder of the current term. A councilor whose judicial district is altered by the General Assembly during the councilor’s term shall continue to serve on the Council until the expiration of the term and shall represent the district wherein the councilor resides or with which the councilor has elected to be affiliated. If before the alteration of the judicial district of the councilor the judicial district included both the place of residence and the place of practice of the councilor, and if after the alteration of the judicial district the councilor’s place of residence and place of practice are located in different districts, the councilor must, not later than 10 days from the effective date of the alteration of the district, notify the Secretary of the North Carolina State Bar of an election to affiliate with and represent either the councilor’s district of residence or district of practice.

In addition to the councilors, there shall be three public members not licensed to practice law in this or any other state who shall be appointed by the Governor. The public members may vote and participate in all matters before the Council to the same extent as councilors elected or appointed from the various judicial districts.

History.

1933, c. 210, s. 3; 1937, c. 51, s. 1; 1955, c. 651, s. 1; 1961, c. 641; 1973, c. 1152, s. 2; 1977, c. 841, s. 2; 1979, c. 570, ss. 1, 2; 1981, c. 788, s. 3; 1985, c. 60, s. 1; 1987, c. 316, s. 1; 1995, c. 431, s. 9; 2007-200, s. 2; 2009-82, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-200, s. 2, effective July 8, 2007, in the first paragraph, rewrote the former first sentence as the first two sentences, substituted “a variable number of councilors equal to the number of judicial districts plus 16” for “55 councilors exclusive of officers, except as hereinafter provided, to be appointed or elected as hereinafter set forth,” in the second sentence, substituted “to this Chapter,” for “hereto,” in the fourth sentence, and substituted “16 additional councilors” for “additional councilors as are necessary to make the total number of councilors 55” in the fifth sentence; and deleted “55” preceding “councilors” in the first sentence of the last paragraph.

Session Laws 2009-82, s. 1, effective June 11, 2009, in the first paragraph, in the third sentence, inserted “borrow money and may”, “lease” and “borrowing of money and the,” and inserted “the borrowing of money” in the middle of the fourth sentence.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on the criminal defendant who proposes or commits perjury, see 17 N.C. Cent. L.J. 157 (1988).

For article, “In Defense of Occupational Licensing: A Legal Practitioner’s Perspective,” see 43 Campbell L. Rev. 423 (2021).

§ 84-18.
Terms, election and appointment of councilors.

Except as set out in this section, the terms of councilors are fixed at three years commencing on the first day of January in the year following their election. A year shall be the calendar year. No councilor may serve more than three successive three-year terms but a councilor may serve an unlimited number of three successive three-year terms provided a three-year period of nonservice intervenes in each instance. Any councilor serving a partial term of 18 months or more is considered to have served a full term and shall be eligible to be elected to only two successive three-year terms in addition to the partial term. Any councilor serving a partial term of less than 18 months is eligible to be elected to three successive three-year terms in addition to the partial term. This paragraph shall not apply to officers of the State Bar.The secretary of a judicial district bar shall notify the secretary-treasurer of the State Bar in writing of any additions to or deletions from the delegation of councilors representing the district within 90 days of the effective date of the change. No new councilor shall assume a seat until official notice of the election has been given to the secretary-treasurer of the State Bar.Any active member of the North Carolina State Bar is eligible to serve as a councilor from the judicial district in which the member is eligible to vote.

The Council may promulgate rules to govern the election and appointment of councilors. The election and appointment of councilors shall be as follows:Each judicial district bar shall elect one eligible North Carolina State Bar member for each Council vacancy in the district. Any vacancy occurring after the election, whether caused by resignation, death, reconfiguration of the district by the General Assembly, or otherwise shall be filled by the judicial district bar in which the vacancy occurs. The appointment shall be for the unexpired portion of the term and shall be certified to the Council by the judicial district bar. Any appointed councilor shall be subject to the terms set forth in subsection (a) of

G.S. 84-18

.

Public members shall serve three-year terms. No public member shall serve more than two complete consecutive terms. The Secretary of the North Carolina State Bar shall promptly inform the Governor when any seat occupied by a public member becomes vacant. The successor shall serve the remainder of the term. Any public member serving a partial term of 18 months or more is considered to have served a full term and is eligible to be elected to only one additional three-year term in addition to the partial term. Any public member serving a partial term of less than 18 months is eligible to be elected to two successive three-year terms in addition to the partial term.

History.

1933, c. 210, s. 4; 1953, c. 1310, s. 1; 1979, c. 570, s. 3; 1981, c. 788, s. 4; 1985, c. 60, ss. 2, 3; 1987, c. 316, s. 2; 1995, c. 431, s. 10.

§ 84-18.1.
Membership and fees of district bars.

The district bar shall be a subdivision of the North Carolina State Bar subject to the general supervisory authority of the Council and may adopt rules, regulations and bylaws that are not inconsistent with this Article. A copy of any rules, regulations and bylaws that are adopted, along with any subsequent amendments, shall be transmitted to the Secretary-Treasurer of the North Carolina State Bar.

Any district bar may from time to time by a majority vote of the members present at a duly called meeting prescribe an annual membership fee to be paid by its active members as a service charge to promote and maintain its administration, activities and programs. The fee shall be in addition to, but shall not exceed, the amount of the membership fee prescribed by

G.S. 84-34

for active members of the North Carolina State Bar. The district bar may also charge a late fee, which shall not exceed fifteen dollars ($15.00), for the failure to pay judicial district bar dues on time. The district bar shall mail a written notice to every active member of the district bar at least 30 days before any meeting at which an election is held to impose or increase mandatory district bar dues. Every active member of a district bar which has prescribed an annual membership fee shall keep its secretary-treasurer notified of his correct mailing address and shall pay the prescribed fee at the time and place set forth in the demand for payment mailed to him by its secretary-treasurer. The name of each active member of a district bar who is more than 12 full calendar months in arrears in the payment of any fee shall be furnished by the secretary-treasurer of the district bar to the Council. In the exercise of its powers as set forth in

G.S. 84-23

, the Council shall thereupon take disciplinary or other action with reference to the delinquent as it considers necessary and proper.

History.

1969, c. 241; 1983, c. 390, s. 1; 1995, c. 431, s. 11; 2005-396, s. 2.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The BarCARES Program could be a lawful use of mandatory bar dues

imposed by local district bar organizations as long as the program was restricted to attorney members of the bar and was directly related to addressing identifiable problems that were affecting, or that might in the future affect, an attorney’s competence to practice law or professional conduct. See opinion of Attorney General to L. Thomas Lunsford, II, Executive Director, North Carolina State Bar, 2001 N.C. AG LEXIS 24 (8/16/01).

§ 84-19.
Judicial districts definition.

For purposes of this Article, the term “judicial district” refers to prosecutorial districts established by the General Assembly and includes the High Point Superior Court District as described under G.S. 7A-41(b)(13). The term “district bar” means the bar of a judicial district as defined by this section.

History.

1933, c. 210, s. 5; 1955, c. 651, s. 2; 1979, c. 570, s. 4; 1987, c. 316, s. 3; 1995, c. 431, s. 12; 2011-28, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-28, s. 1, effective April 7, 2011, subdivided the former section, creating two sentences; and inserted “includes the High Point Superior Court District as described under G.S. 7A-41(b)(13)” in the first sentence.

§ 84-20.
Compensation of councilors.

The members of the Council and members of committees when actually engaged in the performance of their duties, including committees sitting upon disbarment proceedings, shall receive as compensation for the time spent in attending meetings an amount to be determined by the Council, subject to approval of the North Carolina Supreme Court, and shall receive actual expenses of travel and subsistence while engaged in their duties provided that for transportation by use of private automobile the expense of travel shall not exceed the business standard mileage rate set by the Internal Revenue Service per mile of travel. The Council shall determine per diem and mileage to be paid. The allowance fixed by the Council shall be paid by the secretary-treasurer of the North Carolina State Bar upon presentation of appropriate documentation by each member.

History.

1933, c. 210, s. 6; 1935, c. 34; 1953, c. 1310, s. 2; 1971, c. 13, s. 1; 1995, c. 431, s. 13; 2006-66, s. 22.23; 2006-221, s. 24.

§ 84-21.
Organization of Council; publication of rules, regulations and bylaws.

The Council shall adopt the rules pursuant to

G.S. 45A-9

.

The rules and regulations adopted by the Council under this Article may be amended by the Council from time to time in any manner not inconsistent with this Article. Copies of all rules and regulations and of all amendments adopted by the Council shall be certified to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of North Carolina, entered by the North Carolina Supreme Court upon its minutes, and published in the next ensuing number of the North Carolina Reports and in the North Carolina Administrative Code: Provided, that the court shall decline to have so entered upon its minutes any rules, regulations and amendments which in the opinion of the Chief Justice are inconsistent with this Article.

History.

1933, c. 210, s. 7; 1991, c. 418, s. 7; 1995, c. 431, s. 14; 2011-336, s. 8; 2021-189, s. 5.7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-336, s. 8, effective January 1, 2012, added subsection (a); and added the subsection (b) designation.

Session Laws 2021-189, s. 5.7, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “shall” for “may” in the proviso of the last sentence in subsection (b).

Legal Periodicals.

For article on the criminal defendant who proposes or commits perjury, see 17 N.C. Cent. L.J. 157 (1988).

§ 84-22.
Officers and committees of the North Carolina State Bar.

The officers of the North Carolina State Bar and the Council shall consist of a president, president-elect, vice-president and an immediate past president, who shall be deemed members of the Council in all respects. The president, president-elect and vice-president need not be members of the Council at the time of their election. There shall be a secretary-treasurer who shall also have the title of executive director, but who shall not be a member of the Council. All officers shall be elected annually by the Council at an election to take place at the annual meeting of the North Carolina State Bar. The regular term of all officers is one year. The Council is the judge of the election and qualifications of its members.

In addition to the committees and commissions as may be specifically established or authorized by law, the North Carolina State Bar may have committees, standing or special, as from time to time the Council deems appropriate for the proper discharge of the duties and functions of the North Carolina State Bar. The Council shall determine the number of members, composition, method of appointment or election, functions, powers and duties, structure, authority to act, and other matters relating to each committee. Any committee may, at the discretion of the appointing or electing authority, be composed of Council members or members of the North Carolina State Bar who are not members of the Council, or of lay persons, or of any combination.

History.

1933, c. 210, s. 8; 1941, c. 344, ss. 4, 5; 1973, c. 1152, s. 3; 1979, c. 570, s. 5; 1995, c. 431, s. 15.

§ 84-23.
Powers of Council.

The Council is vested, as an agency of the State, with the authority to regulate the professional conduct of licensed lawyers and State Bar certified paralegals. Among other powers, the Council shall administer this Article; take actions that are necessary to ensure the competence of lawyers and State Bar certified paralegals; formulate and adopt rules of professional ethics and conduct; investigate and prosecute matters of professional misconduct; grant or deny petitions for reinstatement; resolve questions pertaining to membership status; arbitrate disputes concerning legal fees; certify legal specialists and paralegals and charge fees to applicants and participants necessary to administer these certification programs; determine whether a member is disabled; maintain an annual registry of interstate and international law firms doing business in this State; and formulate and adopt procedures for accomplishing these purposes. The Council may do all things necessary in the furtherance of the purposes of this Article that are not otherwise prohibited by law.

The Council or any committee of the Council, including the Client Security Fund and the Disciplinary Hearing Commission or any committee of the Commission, may subpoena financial records of any licensed lawyers, lawyers whose licenses have been suspended, or disbarred lawyers, relating to any account into which client or fiduciary funds have been deposited.

The Council may publish an official journal concerning matters of interest to the legal profession.

The Council may acquire, hold, rent, encumber, alienate, lease, and otherwise deal with real or personal property in the same manner as any private person or corporation, subject only to the approval of the Governor and the Council of State as to the acquisition, rental, encumbering, leasing and sale of real property. The Council may borrow money upon its bonds, notes, debentures, or other evidences of indebtedness sold through public or private sale pursuant to a loan agreement or a trust agreement or indenture with a trustee, with such borrowing either unsecured or secured by a mortgage on the Council’s interest in real or personal property, and engage and contract with attorneys, underwriters, financial advisors, and other parties as necessary for such borrowing, with such borrowing and security subject to the approval of the Governor and the Council of State. The Council may utilize the services of the Purchase and Contract Division of the Department of Administration to procure personal property, in accordance with the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. However, the Council shall: (i) submit all proposed contracts for supplies, materials, printing, equipment, and contractual services that exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) authorized by this subsection to the Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee for review as provided in

G.S. 114-8.3

; and (ii) include in all contracts to be awarded by the Council under this subsection a standard clause which provides that the State Auditor and internal auditors of the Council may audit the records of the contractor during and after the term of the contract to verify accounts and data affecting fees and performance. The Council shall not award a cost plus percentage of cost agreement or contract for any purpose.

History.

1933, c. 210, s. 9; 1935, c. 74, s. 1; 1937, c. 51, s. 2; 1975, c. 582, s. 3; 1977, c. 841, s. 2; 1995, c. 431, s. 16; 2003-116, s. 2; 2004-174, s. 1; 2005-396, s. 4; 2009-82, s. 2; 2010-194, s. 12; 2011-326, s. 15(l).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-174, s. 1, effective October 1, 2004, in subsection (a), deleted “Subject to the superior authority of the General Assembly to legislate thereon by general law, and except as herein otherwise limited,” at the beginning of the first sentence, substituted “lawyers and State Bar certified paralegals” for “attorneys” in the first sentence, inserted “and State Bar certified paralegals” following “lawyers” in the second sentence, inserted “and paralegals and charge fees to applicants and participants necessary to administer these certification programs” following “specialists” in the second sentence, and added the last sentence; in subsection (b), substituted “of the Council” for “thereof,” substituted “of the Commission” for “thereof,” substituted “may” for “shall have the authority to,” substituted “lawyers, lawyers” for “attorneys, attorneys,” and substituted “lawyers” for “attorneys”; deleted “and” following “profession” in subsection (c); in subsection (d), added “The Council” at the beginning of the first sentence, and in the last sentence, substituted “may” for “is authorized and empowered in its discretion to” and “to procure” for “for the procurement of” in the last sentence and deleted “and to do all things necessary in the furtherance of the purposes of this Article as are not prohibited by law” from the end.

Session Laws 2009-82, s. 2, effective June 11, 2009, in subsection (d), in the first sentence, inserted “lease”, and added the second sentence.

Session Laws 2011-326, s. 15(
l
), effective June 27, 2011, in the next-to-last sentence of subsection (d), deleted “statewide and agency term” following “proposed” and inserted “and after.”

Legal Periodicals.

For article on rules, ethics and reform in connection with transferring North Carolina real estate, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 593 (1971).

For article on the criminal defendant who proposes or commits perjury, see 17 N.C. Cent. L.J. 157 (1988).

For article, “In Defense of Occupational Licensing: A Legal Practitioner’s Perspective,” see 43 Campbell L. Rev. 423 (2021).

§ 84-23.1.
Prepaid legal services.

This section is in addition to and not a limitation of the powers and responsibilities of the council set out in

G.S. 84-23

. To the extent that this section deals with the same powers and responsibilities it shall be taken to be in amplification of those powers and not in derogation thereof.

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 210, s. 1.

(b1)

All organizations offering prepaid legal services plans shall register those plans with the North Carolina State Bar Council on forms provided by the Council. Each plan shall be registered prior to its implementation or operation in this State and shall renew its registration with the State Bar annually.

(b2)

Every plan shall pay an administrative fee to the Council for the initial registration and an annual renewal fee in amounts determined by the Council.

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 210, s. 1.

Notwithstanding registration of the plan with the North Carolina State Bar Council pursuant to subsection (b1), any plan for prepaid legal services is subject to regulation under Chapter 58 of the General Statutes if offered by a company engaged in the insurance business or if the plan itself constitutes the offering of insurance.

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 210, s. 1.

History.

1975, c. 707, s. 1; 1991, c. 210, s. 1; 2005-396, ss. 5, 6.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Student Legal Services at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill,” see 7 N.C. Cent. L.J. 286 (1976).

For article, “The Advent of Prepaid Legal Services in North Carolina,” see 13 Wake Forest L. Rev. 271 (1977).

§ 84-24.
Admission to practice.

For the purpose of examining applicants and providing rules and regulations for admission to the Bar including the issuance of license therefor, there is hereby created the Board of Law Examiners, which shall consist of 11 members of the Bar, elected by the Council, who need not be members of the Council. No teacher in any law school, however, shall be eligible. The members of the Board of Law Examiners elected from the Bar shall each hold office for a term of three years.

The Board of Law Examiners shall elect a member of the Board as chair thereof, and the Board may employ an executive secretary and provide such assistance as may be required to enable the Board to perform its duties promptly and properly. The chair and any employees shall serve for a period of time determined by the Board.

The examination shall be held in the manner and at the times as the Board of Law Examiners may determine.

The Board of Law Examiners shall have full power and authority to make or cause to be made such examinations and investigations as may be deemed by it necessary to satisfy it that the applicants for admission to the Bar possess the qualifications of character and general fitness requisite for an attorney and counselor-at-law and to this end the Board of Law Examiners shall have the power of subpoena and to summons and examine witnesses under oath and to compel their attendance and the production of books, papers and other documents and writings deemed by it to be necessary or material to the inquiry and shall also have authority to employ and provide assistance as may be required to enable it to perform its duties promptly and properly. Records, papers, and other documents containing information collected and compiled by the Board or its members or employees as a result of investigations, inquiries, or interviews conducted in connection with examinations or licensing matters, are not public records within the meaning of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

All applicants for admission to the Bar shall be fingerprinted to determine whether the applicant has a record of criminal conviction in this State or in any other state or jurisdiction. The information obtained as a result of the fingerprinting of an applicant shall be limited to the official use of the Board of Law Examiners in determining the character and general fitness of the applicant.

The Department of Public Safety may provide a criminal record check to the Board of Law Examiners for a person who has applied for a license through the Board. The Board shall provide to the Department of Public Safety, along with the request, the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information required by the Department of Public Safety, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal record and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the State or national repositories. The applicant’s fingerprints shall be forwarded to the State Bureau of Investigation for a search of the State’s criminal history record file, and the State Bureau of Investigation shall forward a set of the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history check. The Board shall keep all information pursuant to this subsection privileged, in accordance with applicable State law and federal guidelines, and the information shall be confidential and shall not be a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

The Department of Public Safety may charge each applicant a fee for conducting the checks of criminal history records authorized by this section.

The Board of Law Examiners, subject to the approval of the Council, shall by majority vote, from time to time, make, alter, and amend such rules and regulations for admission to the Bar as in their judgment shall promote the welfare of the State and the profession: Provided, that no change in the educational requirements for admission to the Bar that establishes an additional or greater requirement shall become effective until two years after the date of the adoption of the change.

All rules and regulations, and modifications, alterations and amendments thereof, shall be recorded and promulgated as provided in

G.S. 84-21

in relation to the certificate of organization and the rules and regulations of the Council.

Whenever the Council shall order the restoration of license to any person as authorized by

G.S. 84-32

, it shall be the duty of the Board of Law Examiners to issue a written license to the person, noting thereon that the license is issued in compliance with an order of the Council, whether the license to practice law was issued by the Board of Law Examiners or the Supreme Court in the first instance.

Appeals from the Board shall be had in accordance with rules or procedures as may be approved by the Supreme Court as may be submitted under

G.S. 84-21

or as may be promulgated by the Supreme Court.

History.

1933, c. 210, s. 10; c. 331; 1935, cc. 33, 61; 1941, c. 344, s. 6; 1947, c. 77; 1951, c. 991, s. 1; 1953, c. 1012; 1965, cc. 65, 725; 1973, c. 13; 1977, c. 841, s. 2; 1983, c. 177; 1991, c. 210, s. 4; 1995, c. 431, s. 17; 2002-147, s. 5; 2014-100, s. 17.1(o); 2015-264, s. 47.

Cross References.

As to discipline and disbarment, see

G.S. 84-28

.

As to restoration of license to practice law, see

G.S. 84-32

.

§ 84-25.
Fees of applicants.

All applicants before the Board of Law Examiners shall pay such fees as prescribed under the rules of said Board as may be promulgated under

G.S. 84-21

and 84-24.

History.

1935, c. 33, s. 1; 1955, c. 651, s. 3.

§ 84-26.
Expenses of Board of Law Examiners.

Notwithstanding G.S. 93B-5(b), each member of the Board of Law Examiners shall receive the member’s actual expenses of travel and subsistence while engaged in duties assigned to the member; provided, however, that for transportation by the use of private automobile the expense of that transportation shall be the same as paid other boards and commissions by the State.

History.

1935, c. 33, s. 2; 1937, c. 35; 1953, c. 1310, s. 3; 1971, c. 13, s. 2; 1973, c. 1368; 2013-9, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to compensation, employment, and training of board members, see

G.S. 93B-5

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-9, s. 1, effective March 13, 2013, substituted “Expenses” for “Pay” in the section heading; and added “Notwithstanding G.S. 93B-5(b),” substituted “the member’s” for “the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00) for his services in connection with each examination and shall receive his,” “the member; provided, however” for “him, provided” and “that transportation” for “travel.”

§ 84-27.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1945, c. 782.